Nebraska, session 109, LB49.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB49 LB49
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-405, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-405 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
every Every duly organized school district shall be a body corporate and
possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes, may
sue and be sued, and may purchase, hold, and sell such personal and real
estate as the law allows. The county in which the principal office of the
school district is located together with the school district number
assigned pursuant to section 79-307 shall constitute the corporate name
of the school district, such as ........ County School District ....... .
(2) The general authority of a school district to restrict access to
school property and school activities in order to protect students,
school staff, and other individuals, shall be subject to the limitations
provided in section 2 of this act.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Ban and bar action means any action by a school district to
prohibit students, family members of students, or other individuals from
being on school property, attending school activities, or communicating
with school officials, subject to enforcement as criminal trespass under
sections 28-520 to 28-522 if an individual violates a ban and bar action;
(b) Board means the State Board of Education;
(c) School board has the same meaning as in section 79-101; and
(d) School district has the same meaning as in section 79-101.
(2)(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the board shall develop and
distribute a model policy relating to a ban and bar action. Such policy
shall:
(i) Specify that a ban and bar action by a school district shall
only be used in response to an immediate and significant threat of harm
to a student, school official, or other individual or to facilitate the
enforcement of a court order;
(ii) Specify that any ban and bar action shall be limited in scope
-2-

LB49 LB49
2025 2025
and duration in such a manner to accommodate the right of parents and
family members to be involved in their child's education and, in no event
exceed one calendar year unless otherwise required by court order;
(iii) Protect the right of parents to be involved in the education
of their children and their right to contest, appeal, or otherwise
challenge a ban and bar action;
(iv) Not discriminate or be applied in a discriminatory manner
against any family members on the basis of race, color, religion, sex,
disability, or national origin;
(v) Provide that any individual subject to a ban and bar action
shall be given written notice of such action that includes the term of
the ban and bar action, a description of the conduct giving rise to the
ban and bar action and the evidence the school district has of such
conduct, and instructions on how to appeal such ban and bar action; and
(vi) Not be used against a student of the school district.
(b) Any individual subject to a ban and bar action may request a
hearing before the school board. The individual may appear at the hearing
to contest the issuance or scope of the ban and bar action. An appeal
shall be requested in writing and delivered to the school board within
ten days after receipt of notice by the individual of the ban and bar
action. Such individual may be represented by counsel at such
individual's expense. The school board shall hear an appeal pursuant to
this section within thirty days after receipt of an appeal request.
(2) On or before July 1, 2026, each public school district shall
either adopt the model policy or adopt a policy consistent with the model
policy.
Sec. 3. Original section 79-405, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-